Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201583-1,122.01
Board of Parole; jurisdiction.

The board shall not have jurisdiction over persons who are committed to the department in accordance with section 29-2204.02 unless the defendant is also sentenced for an offense in accordance with section 29-2204.

Laws 2015, LB605, § 104.
August 30, 2015